Louisiana, session 2026, HB227.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 253(B)(2) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 253. Pleadings, documents, and exhibits to be filed with clerk
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) On and after January 1, 2026, all filings as provided in Paragraph A of
this Article and all other provisions of this Chapter filed by an attorney shall only be
filed in person in paper form or transmitted electronically in accordance with a
system established by a clerk of court or by Louisiana Clerks' Remote Access
Authority. Any pleading or document filed electronically or in paper form is
acceptable on legal or letter size paper. The filer shall be responsible for ensuring
that private information is not included in filings. No filing shall include the first
five digits of any social security number, tax identification numbers number, state
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 227 ENROLLED
identification numbers number, driver's license numbers number, financial account
numbers number, full dates of birth, or any information protected from disclosure by
state or federal law. The clerk of court shall adopt a system for the electronic filing
and storage of any pleading, document, or exhibit filed with a pleading. A pleading
or document filed electronically is deemed filed on the date and time stated on the
confirmation of electronic filing sent from the system, if the clerk of court accepts
the electronic filing. Public access to electronically filed pleadings and documents
shall be in accordance with the rules governing access to paper filings.
* * *
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 14.1(B) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 14.1. Electronic filings
* * *
B. Beginning January 1, 2026, all filings as provided in this Article and all
other provisions of this Code filed by an attorney shall only be filed in person in
paper form or transmitted electronically in accordance with a system established by
a clerk of court or by the Louisiana Clerks' Remote Access Authority. Any pleading
or document filed electronically or in paper form is acceptable on legal or letter size
paper. The filer shall be responsible for ensuring that private information is not
included in filings. No filing shall include the first five digits of any social security
number, tax identification numbers number, state identification numbers number,
driver's license numbers number, financial account numbers number, full dates of
birth, or any information protected from disclosure by state or federal law. The clerk
of court shall adopt a system for the electronic filing and storage of any pleading,
document, or exhibit other than those documents or exhibits introduced and filed at
a hearing or trial. Furthermore, in a court that accepts electronic filings in
accordance with this Paragraph, the official record shall be the electronic record. A
pleading or document filed electronically is deemed filed on the date and time stated
on the confirmation of electronic filing sent from the system, if the clerk of court
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 227 ENROLLED
accepts the electronic filing. Public access to electronically filed pleadings and
documents shall be in accordance with the rules governing access to written filings.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.